Vermont statutes. Title 14 Decedents’ Estates and Fiduciary Relations
Subchapter 6. Sale of Real Estate

§ 2881.
Real estate; when may be sold.

The Probate Division of the Superior Court may authorize guardians to sell a part or all of the lands of their wards or the interest of such wards in real estate, vested or contingent, in the following cases:

when the personal estate of a ward is insufficient to pay the expenses of maintaining the ward and his or her family, or of educating a minor ward as his or her circumstances require;

when the personal estate of a ward is insufficient to pay his or her debts contracted before or after the appointment of his or her guardian;

when it appears to the court conducive to the interest of the ward to sell the real estate, or an interest vested or contingent in the real estate and put the proceeds at interest or invest it in stocks or in real estate.

HISTORY:

Amended

1979, No. 76

, § 9;

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 238a, eff. Feb. 1, 2011.

§ 2882.
Regulations under which license granted.

As provided in section 2881 of this title, the order of a Probate Division of the Superior Court licensing the sale of lands of wards shall be made under the following regulations:

On motion of the guardian for license to sell, the probate division of the superior court shall schedule a hearing and notice shall be given as provided by the Rules of Probate Procedure.

At the hearing, the guardian shall produce evidence of the value of the estate to be sold, the interest of the ward therein and of the necessity of sale.

Before license is granted and if the court requires, the guardian shall give a bond with sufficient sureties, in a sum double the value of the land to be sold, conditioned to account for the proceeds of the sale, according to law, and shall also be sworn to sell the estate as judged will be most beneficial to the ward. A certificate of the oath made by the authority administering it shall be returned to the Probate Division of the Superior Court before the license issues.

If the foregoing requisites are complied with, the court may order a public or private sale of the lands of the ward or an interest in the same, or such part thereof as the court deems necessary, and shall furnish the guardian with a certified copy of its order.

If the court directs a public sale, the order shall designate the mode of giving notice of the time and place thereof, and the sale shall be in the town where the lands lie.

The order of sale shall state that the requisites mentioned in subdivisions (1)-(3) of this section have been complied with. A copy thereof shall be recorded, previous to the sale, in the office where a deed of such lands is required to be recorded.

HISTORY:

Amended

1985, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 138;

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 238a, eff. Feb. 1, 2011.

§ 2883.
Term of license.

Such license shall not continue in force more than two years.

§ 2884.
Deed, effect of.

A deed executed by a guardian of the lands of his or her ward under such order of sale shall be valid and shall convey the interest of the ward in the lands, whether vested or contingent.

§ 2885.
Guardian to report sale.

Within three months after a sale of real estate of his or her ward under a license, a guardian shall make report of his or her proceedings, setting forth the time and manner of sale, the person to whom and the price for which it was sold and a description of each parcel sold.
Such report shall be filed and docketed in the Probate Division, but neglect to make the report shall not affect the title to the lands sold.

HISTORY:

Amended

1971, No. 179

(Adj. Sess.), § 10.

§ 2886.
License when guardian or ward resides out of state.

On motion to the Probate Division of the Superior Court for an order to sell the real estate of a ward, when the sale is necessary or conducive to the interests of that person, a license may be granted as provided in this chapter, although the guardian making the motion, or the ward, or both, reside out of the State.

HISTORY:

Amended

1979, No. 76

, § 10;

1985, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 139;

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 238a, eff. Feb. 1, 2011.

§ 2887.
Conveyance of land that ward was under contract to convey.

When a person, while not under guardianship, was under contract binding in law or equity to deed lands, on motion, the Probate Division of the Superior Court may grant license to the guardian of that person to convey those lands according to the contract.
The court shall schedule a hearing and notice shall be given as provided by the Rules of Probate Procedure.

HISTORY:

Amended

1979, No. 76

, § 11;

1985, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 140;

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 238a, eff. Feb. 1, 2011.

§ 2888.
License not to be granted to creditors’ injury.

The license shall not be granted if it appears to the court that the conveyance would so reduce the assets in the hands of the guardian as to lessen the amount that creditors would receive from the estate of the ward.

§ 2889.
If guardian grantee, judge to convey; deed, effect of.

If the contract is to convey lands to the guardian, the judge of the Probate Division shall execute the deed.
Such deed, or the deed of the guardian, as the case may be, shall be as effectual to convey the lands as if executed by the ward when not under guardianship.

HISTORY:

Amended

1979, No. 76

, § 12.

§ 2890.
Lands held in trust to be conveyed to beneficiary.

When a person, while not under guardianship, held lands in trust for another person, or where lands have been set off on execution to a ward on a debt in the name of the ward but being the debt of some other person, and not belonging to the ward, upon motion, the Probate Division of the Superior Court shall schedule a hearing and notice shall be given as provided by the Rules of Probate Procedure.
The court may grant license to the guardian to deed the lands to the person for whose benefit they are held. The court may decree the execution of the trust, whether created by deed or by law.

HISTORY:

Amended

1979, No. 76

, § 13;

1985, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 141;

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 238a, eff. Feb. 1, 2011.

§ 2891.
When guardian dies or is removed pending sale, new license.

If the guardian dies, resigns, or is removed before the completion of a sale of real estate under a license, within two years from the time of granting the same, the court may issue a new license to his successor without further notice or hearing.